Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.09, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given to them. (a) "Eligible institution" means a Minnesota public postsecondary institution, a private, nonprofit two-year trade and technical school granting associate degrees, an opportunities industrialization center accredited by an accreditor recognized by the United States Department of Education, or a private, residential, two-year or four-year, liberal arts, degree-granting college or university located in Minnesota. deleted text begin An eligible institution must not require a faith statement from a secondary student seeking to enroll in a postsecondary course under this section during the application process or base any part of the admission decision on a student's race, creed, ethnicity, disability, gender, or sexual orientation or religious beliefs or affiliations.deleted text end (b) "Course" means a course or program. (c) "Concurrent enrollment" means nonsectarian courses in which an eligible pupil under subdivision 5 or 5b enrolls to earn both secondary and postsecondary credits, are taught by a secondary teacher or a postsecondary faculty member, and are offered at a high school for which the school district, charter school, or Tribal contract school is eligible to receive concurrent enrollment program aid under section 124D.091. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEGAL FEES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for the payment of fees and expenses awarded to the plaintiff in Loe v. Jett, Case No. 23-CV-1527, if an order granting the plaintiff's motion for fees and expenses is filed in that case. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must pay, on behalf of all defendants, all fees and expenses awarded to the plaintiff. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end